Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 72 Y 367
SFX 72    0       iok      .
SFX 72    ts       stearen/698      ts
SFX 72    0       ion/705      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrei      .
SFX 72    0       iren/703      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrik      .
SFX 72    0       iko      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrek      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrak      .
SFX 72    0       itzarren      .
SFX 72    0       iaren/703      .
SFX 72    0       iekin      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoraino      ts
SFX 72    ts       steon/705      ts
SFX 72    0       itxoarekin      .
SFX 72    ts       sterekin      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxoentzat      ts
SFX 72    ts       steko/693      ts
SFX 72    0       ioz      .
SFX 72    0       iegietarantz      .
SFX 72    0       arazten      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxorendako      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarraren      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrez      .
SFX 72    0       iegiotaz      .
SFX 72    0       itzarraz      .
SFX 72    ts       steetaraino      ts
SFX 72    ts       steagandik      ts
SFX 72    ts       steen/703      ts
SFX 72    ts       steke      ts
SFX 72    ts       steren/698      ts
SFX 72    ts       steoi      ts
SFX 72    0       iegirik      .
SFX 72    ts       steok      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarrekin      .
SFX 72    0       ien/696      .
SFX 72    0       araz      .
SFX 72    0       iegiren      .
SFX 72    0       itxo      .
SFX 72    0       iegirat      .
SFX 72    ts       steoz      ts
SFX 72    0       itxogatik      .
SFX 72    0       iokin      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarroi      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrok      ts
SFX 72    0       ia      .
SFX 72    0       itxoekin      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarron      ts
SFX 72    0       iegi      .
SFX 72    0       ik      .
SFX 72    0       ietarik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrarendako      ts
SFX 72    ts       stezko      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarroz      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarreko      ts
SFX 72    0       iotarantz      .
SFX 72    0       itxotik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetik      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzargatik      ts
SFX 72    0       ietarat      .
SFX 72    0       iz      .
SFX 72    0       iegietako      .
SFX 72    ts       stetan      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarrokin      .
SFX 72    0       itxoendako      .
SFX 72    ts       stearekiko      ts
SFX 72    0       itxookin      .
SFX 72    ts       steotarik      ts
SFX 72    0       itxooi      .
SFX 72    0       itxook      .
SFX 72    0       itxoon      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrerat      .
SFX 72    0       itxoko      .
SFX 72    ts       steotarat      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarrarekin      .
SFX 72    0       itxoa      .
SFX 72    0       irik      .
SFX 72    0       itxooz      .
SFX 72    0       itxoaren      .
SFX 72    0       itxok      .
SFX 72    0       itarantz      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrendako      ts
SFX 72    0       irat      .
SFX 72    0       itxoz      .
SFX 72    0       iegioi      .
SFX 72    0       itxorantz      .
SFX 72    0       iegiok      .
SFX 72    0       iagatik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxorentzat      ts
SFX 72    0       iegion      .
SFX 72    ts       steagan      ts
SFX 72    0       iekiko      .
SFX 72    0       iegiko      .
SFX 72    0       iaganaino      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoarendako      ts
SFX 72    0       araztear      .
SFX 72    0       iegioz      .
SFX 72    0       itarik      .
SFX 72    0       ietarantz      .
SFX 72    ts       stetaraino      ts
SFX 72    0       itarat      .
SFX 72    ts       stenago      ts
SFX 72    0       iegitik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxooi      ts
SFX 72    0       iegitara      .
SFX 72    0       igatik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxook      ts
SFX 72    0       iegitan      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoon      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxoko      ts
SFX 72    0       iegiontzat      .
SFX 72    0       igatiko      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxooz      ts
SFX 72    0       ita      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrarentzat      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarrari      .
SFX 72    0       ietatik      .
SFX 72    0       ietan      .
SFX 72    ts       stetako      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarreraino      .
SFX 72    0       iegitaraino      .
SFX 72    ts       steekiko      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetarik      ts
SFX 72    ts       steari      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarretik      .
SFX 72    0       ietara      .
SFX 72    ts       stetarat      ts
SFX 72    ts       steotatik      ts
SFX 72    0       izko      .
SFX 72    0       iotan      .
SFX 72    0       itzarra      .
SFX 72    ts       stegatik      ts
SFX 72    0       itik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrentzat      ts
SFX 72    0       itan      .
SFX 72    0       arazte      .
SFX 72    0       i      .
SFX 72    0       itzarri      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzar      ts
SFX 72    0       iotaz      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzat      ts
SFX 72    ts       sterako      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxogatik      ts
SFX 72    0       irantz      .
SFX 72    ts       stearekin      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarrean      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrendako      .
SFX 72    0       itzargatik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoarentzat      ts
SFX 72    ts       steotarantz      ts
SFX 72    0       itatik      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrotaz      .
SFX 72    0       iegiarendako      .
SFX 72    0       iokiko      .
SFX 72    0       iegirekin      .
SFX 72    0       iegiarekin      .
SFX 72    0       itxoentzat      .
SFX 72    0       itxoarendako      .
SFX 72    ts       steetara      ts
SFX 72    0       itxootaz      .
SFX 72    0       itxoari      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrerantz      ts
SFX 72    ts       sterekiko      ts
SFX 72    0       iegiari      .
SFX 72    ts       sterantz      ts
SFX 72    0       iregatik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxorantz      ts
SFX 72    ts       steaganaino      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetatik      ts
SFX 72    ts       steetarantz      ts
SFX 72    0       iegiraino      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxotzat      ts
SFX 72    ts       steokiko      ts
SFX 72    0       iagandik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxorik      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxoren      ts
SFX 72    0       iegitako      .
SFX 72    0       iriko      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxorat      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarrentzat      .
SFX 72    0       iari      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrari      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarrago      .
SFX 72    0       iei      .
SFX 72    ts       steekin      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarroi      .
SFX 72    0       iek      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrok      .
SFX 72    0       iak      .
SFX 72    0       ian      .
SFX 72    0       itzarron      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoontzat      ts
SFX 72    0       itara      .
SFX 72    0       iez      .
SFX 72    0       itzarroz      .
SFX 72    0       iaz      .
SFX 72    0       itxoarentzat      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoekin      ts
SFX 72    0       iegitzat      .
SFX 72    ts       steago      ts
SFX 72    0       ietako      .
SFX 72    ts       steei      ts
SFX 72    ts       steek      ts
SFX 72    0       ikeran      .
SFX 72    ts       steak      ts
SFX 72    ts       steokin      ts
SFX 72    ts       stean      ts
SFX 72    ts       stear      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarrera      .
SFX 72    ts       steez      ts
SFX 72    ts       steaz      ts
SFX 72    0       iegiendako      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrei      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrik      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrek      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrak      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarren      ts
SFX 72    0       iotara      .
SFX 72    0       arazi      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrean      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrez      ts
SFX 72    ts       stearren      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarraz      ts
SFX 72    0       iaganantz      .
SFX 72    0       iegietaraino      .
SFX 72    0       itxorendako      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoaren      ts
SFX 72    0       itzartzat      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrarendako      .
SFX 72    ts       stetarantz      ts
SFX 72    0       iegiarentzat      .
SFX 72    ts       stea      ts
SFX 72    0       itxoei      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoa      ts
SFX 72    0       itxoek      .
SFX 72    ts       steetarik      ts
SFX 72    0       itxoak      .
SFX 72    0       itxoen      .
SFX 72    0       itxoan      .
SFX 72    ts       stek      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxotik      ts
SFX 72    ts       steetako      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxok      ts
SFX 72    ts       sten      ts
SFX 72    ts       steetarat      ts
SFX 72    0       itxoago      .
SFX 72    0       itxoez      .
SFX 72    0       itxoaz      .
SFX 72    ts       stez      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxoz      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxoarekin      ts
SFX 72    0       iarekiko      .
SFX 72    ts       steotara      ts
SFX 72    0       itxorekin      .
SFX 72    0       iotaraino      .
SFX 72    ts       stegatiko      ts
SFX 72    0       arazteke      .
SFX 72    0       iegia      .
SFX 72    0       iegietarik      .
SFX 72    0       iegiei      .
SFX 72    0       iegiek      .
SFX 72    0       iegiak      .
SFX 72    0       iegien      .
SFX 72    0       iegian      .
SFX 72    0       iotarik      .
SFX 72    0       iegik      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrerantz      .
SFX 72    0       iegitarantz      .
SFX 72    0       iegietarat      .
SFX 72    0       iegiaren      .
SFX 72    0       iagan      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxookin      ts
SFX 72    0       iegiez      .
SFX 72    0       iegiaz      .
SFX 72    0       iotarat      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrekin      ts
SFX 72    0       iegiz      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoei      ts
SFX 72    0       iegiekin      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoek      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxoak      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxoen      ts
SFX 72    0       iegirendako      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoan      ts
SFX 72    ts       steagatik      ts
SFX 72    0       iegientzat      .
SFX 72    0       itaraino      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoez      ts
SFX 72    0       iegitarik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoaz      ts
SFX 72    ts       steetan      ts
SFX 72    0       ira      .
SFX 72    0       iegitarat      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrokin      ts
SFX 72    0       iri      .
SFX 72    0       itxoraino      .
SFX 72    0       iago      .
SFX 72    0       itxorentzat      .
SFX 72    0       iegigatik      .
SFX 72    0       itzarrarentzat      .
SFX 72    0       iagana      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarraren      ts
SFX 72    0       ietaraino      .
SFX 72    0       iegiokin      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrerat      ts
SFX 72    0       itako      .
SFX 72    ts       stera      ts
SFX 72    ts       steotan      ts
SFX 72    ts       steetatik      ts
SFX 72    ts       steri      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrontzat      ts
SFX 72    ts       steotaz      ts
SFX 72    0       irekin      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarrera      ts
SFX 72    0       itzarregi      .
SFX 72    0       itzar      .
SFX 72    0       itzat      .
SFX 72    0       itzarreko      .
SFX 72    0       iegietara      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxoari      ts
SFX 72    0       iegietatik      .
SFX 72    ts       stetxo      ts
SFX 72    0       iotako      .
SFX 72    0       irekiko      .
SFX 72    0       iotatik      .
SFX 72    ts       steagana      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzarra      ts
SFX 72    ts       steaganantz      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetxoendako      ts
SFX 72    0       itxoegi      .
SFX 72    ts       stetzarri      ts
SFX 72    ts       stetzartzat      ts
SFX 72    0       itxoontzat      .
SFX 72    0       itxora      .
SFX 72    0       iegirantz      .
SFX 72    ts       sterainoko      ts
SFX 72    0       itxori      .
SFX 72    0       iegirentzat      .
SFX 72    0       iarekin      .
SFX 72    0       itxotzat      .
SFX 72    0       iegitatik      .
SFX 72    0       iraino      .
SFX 72    0       iegira      .
SFX 72    ts       stetiko      ts
SFX 72    0       iegiri      .
